Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5862.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 41.32.4992 and 2024 c 255 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Beneficiaries who are receiving a monthly benefit from the teachers' retirement system plan 1 on July 1, 2017, shall receive, effective July 1, 2018, an increase to their monthly benefit of one and one-half percent multiplied by the beneficiaries' monthly benefit, not to exceed $62.50.(2) Beneficiaries who are receiving a monthly benefit from the teachers' retirement system plan 1 on July 1, 2019, shall receive, effective July 1, 2020, an increase to their monthly benefit of three percent multiplied by the beneficiaries' monthly benefit, not to exceed $62.50.(3) Beneficiaries who are receiving a monthly benefit from the teachers' retirement system plan 1 on July 1, 2021, shall receive, effective July 1, 2022, an increase to their monthly benefit of three percent multiplied by the beneficiaries' monthly benefit, not to exceed $110.00.(4) Beneficiaries who are receiving a monthly benefit from the teachers' retirement system plan 1 on July 1, 2022, shall receive, effective July 1, 2023, an increase to their monthly benefit of three percent multiplied by the beneficiaries' monthly benefit, not to exceed $110.00.(5) Beneficiaries who are receiving a monthly benefit from the teachers' retirement system plan 1 on July 1, 2023, shall receive, effective July 1, 2024, an increase to their monthly benefit of three percent multiplied by the beneficiaries' monthly benefit, not to exceed $110.00.(6) Beneficiaries who are receiving a monthly benefit from the teachers' retirement system plan 1 on July 1, 2025, shall receive, effective July 1, 2026, an increase to their monthly benefit of three percent multiplied by the beneficiaries' monthly benefit, not to exceed $110.00.(7) This section does not apply to those receiving benefits pursuant to RCW 41.32.489 or 41.32.540.Sec. 2. RCW 41.40.1987 and 2024 c 255 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Beneficiaries who are receiving a monthly benefit from the public employees' retirement system plan 1 on July 1, 2017, shall receive, effective July 1, 2018, an increase to their monthly benefit of one and one-half percent multiplied by the beneficiaries' monthly benefit, not to exceed $62.50.(2) Beneficiaries who are receiving a monthly benefit from the public employees' retirement system plan 1 on July 1, 2019, shall receive, effective July 1, 2020, an increase to their monthly benefit of three percent multiplied by the beneficiaries' monthly benefit, not to exceed $62.50.(3) Beneficiaries who are receiving a monthly benefit from the public employees' retirement system plan 1 on July 1, 2021, shall receive, effective July 1, 2022, an increase to their monthly benefit of three percent multiplied by the beneficiaries' monthly benefit, not to exceed $110.00.(4) Beneficiaries who are receiving a monthly benefit from the public employees' retirement system plan 1 on July 1, 2022, shall receive, effective July 1, 2023, an increase to their monthly benefit of three percent multiplied by the beneficiaries' monthly benefit, not to exceed $110.00.(5) Beneficiaries who are receiving a monthly benefit from the public employees' retirement system plan 1 on July 1, 2023, shall receive, effective July 1, 2024, an increase to their monthly benefit of three percent multiplied by the beneficiaries' monthly benefit, not to exceed $110.00.(6) Beneficiaries who are receiving a monthly benefit from the public employees' retirement system plan 1 on July 1, 2025, shall receive, effective July 1, 2026, an increase to their monthly benefit of three percent multiplied by the beneficiaries' monthly benefit, not to exceed $110.00.(7) This section does not apply to those receiving benefits pursuant to RCW 41.40.1984.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026.--- END ---